District of Columbia statutes.
44-662.06

Federal determinations; suspension and termination of assessment.

(a)

If the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services determines that an assessment imposed on a hospital pursuant to this chapter does not satisfy the requirements for federal financial participation set forth in section 1903(w) of the Social Security Act that determination shall not affect the validity, amount, applicable rate, or any other terms of an assessment on other hospitals imposed by this chapter.

(b)

If the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services determines that an exclusion for specialty hospitals under this chapter would prevent an assessment imposed by this chapter from qualifying as a broad-based health care related tax, as that term is defined in section 1903(w)(3)(B) of the Social Security Act, the exclusion of specialty hospitals shall not be made.

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 5077, 62 DCR 10905

History